Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-261
Pay-per-call services, defined.

Pay-per-call services means telecommunications services which permit simultaneous calling by a large number of callers to a single telephone number and for which the calling party is assessed, by virtue of completing the call, a charge that is not dependent on the existence of a presubscription relationship and for which the caller pays a per-call or per-time-interval charge that is greater than or in addition to the charge for transmission of the call.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 123.